Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20183-152
Violations; penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of the State Aeronautics Act, or any of the rules, regulations, or orders adopted, promulgated, or issued pursuant thereto, shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 17, p. 101;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 29;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 43.